Nebraska, session 109, LB133.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Section 28-1008, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
28-1008 For purposes of sections 28-1008 to 28-1017, 28-1019, and 28-1020:
(1) Abandon means to leave any animal in one's care, whether as owner or
custodian, for any length of time without making effective provision for its
food, water, or other care as is reasonably necessary for the animal's health;
(2) Animal means any vertebrate member of the animal kingdom. Animal does
not include an uncaptured wild creature or a livestock animal as defined in
section 54-902;
(3) Animal control officer means a person authorized by a city, village,
or county to enforce any state or local animal control law, rule, regulation,
resolution, or ordinance concerning animal welfare;
(4) (3) Cruelly mistreat means to knowingly and intentionally kill, maim,
disfigure, torture, beat, kick, hit, strike in any manner, mutilate, burn,
scald, or otherwise inflict harm upon any animal;
(5) (4) Cruelly neglect means to fail to provide any animal in one's care,
whether as owner or custodian, with food, water, or other care as is reasonably
necessary for the animal's health;
(6) (5) Humane killing means the destruction of an animal by a method
which causes the animal a minimum of pain and suffering;
(7) (6) Law enforcement officer means any member of the Nebraska State
Patrol, any county or deputy sheriff, any member of the police force of any
city or village, or any other public official authorized by a city or village
to enforce state or local animal control laws, rules, regulations, or
ordinances. Law enforcement officer also includes a special investigator
appointed as a deputy state sheriff as authorized pursuant to section 81-201
while acting within the authority of the Director of Agriculture under the
Commercial Dog and Cat Operator Inspection Act;
(8) (7) Mutilation means intentionally causing permanent injury,
disfigurement, degradation of function, incapacitation, or imperfection to an
animal. Mutilation does not include conduct performed by a veterinarian
licensed to practice veterinary medicine and surgery in this state or conduct
that conforms to accepted veterinary practices;
(9) (8) Owner or custodian means any person owning, keeping, possessing,
harboring, or knowingly permitting an animal to remain on or about any premises
owned or occupied by such person;
(10) (9) Police animal means a horse or dog owned or controlled by the
State of Nebraska or any county, city, or village for the purpose of assisting
a law enforcement officer in the performance of his or her official enforcement
duties;
(11) (10) Repeated beating means intentional successive strikes to an
animal by a person resulting in serious injury or illness or death to the
animal;
(12) (11) Serious injury or illness includes any injury or illness to any
animal which creates a substantial risk of death or which causes broken bones,
prolonged impairment of health, or prolonged loss or impairment of the function
of any bodily organ; and
(13) (12) Torture means intentionally subjecting an animal to extreme
pain, suffering, or agony. Torture does not include conduct performed by a
veterinarian licensed to practice veterinary medicine and surgery in this state
or conduct that conforms to accepted veterinary practices.
Sec. 2. Section 28-1012, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
28-1012 (1) Any A law enforcement officer or animal control officer who
has reason to believe that an animal has been abandoned or is being cruelly
neglected or cruelly mistreated may seek a warrant authorizing entry by a law
enforcement officer or an animal control officer who is accompanied by a law
enforcement officer upon private property to inspect, care for, or impound the
animal.
(2) It shall be the duty of any a law enforcement officer or animal
control officer who has reason to believe that an animal has been abandoned or
is being cruelly neglected or cruelly mistreated to make prompt investigation
of such violation. Any A law enforcement officer or animal control officer may,
in lieu of making an arrest, issue a citation to the owner or custodian as
prescribed in sections 29-422 to 29-429.
-1-

LB133 LB133
2025 2025
(3) Any equipment, device, or other property or things involved in a
violation of section 28-1009 or 28-1010 shall be subject to seizure, and
distribution or disposition may be made in such manner as the court may direct.
Any animal involved in a violation of section 28-1009 or 28-1010 shall be
subject to seizure. Distribution or disposition shall be made under section
28-1012.01 as the court may direct.
(4) Any law enforcement officer or animal control officer acting under
this section shall not be liable for damage to property if such damage is not
the result of the law enforcement officer's or animal control officer's
negligence.
Sec. 3. Section 28-1012.01, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
28-1012.01 (1) Any animal seized under a search warrant or validly seized
without a warrant may be kept on the property of the owner or custodian by the
law enforcement officer or animal control officer seizing the animal. When a
criminal complaint has been filed in connection with a seized animal, the court
in which such complaint was filed shall have exclusive jurisdiction for
disposition of the animal and to determine any rights therein, including
questions respecting the title, possession, control, and disposition thereof as
provided in this section.
(2) Within ten business days after the date an animal has been seized
pursuant to section 28-1006 or 28-1012, the county attorney of the county where
the animal was seized shall file an application with the court having
appropriate jurisdiction for a hearing to determine the disposition and the
cost for the care of the animal. Notice of such hearing shall be given to the
owner or custodian from whom such animal was seized and to any holder of a lien
or security interest of record in such animal specifying the date, time, and
place of such hearing. Such notice shall be served by personal or residential
service or by certified mail. If such notice cannot be served by such methods,
service may be made by publication in the county where such animal was seized.
Such publication shall be made after application and order of the court. The
hearing shall be held as soon as practicable and not more than ten business
days after the date of application for the hearing unless otherwise determined
and ordered by the court.
(3) If the court finds that probable cause exists that an animal has been
abandoned or cruelly neglected or mistreated, the court may:
(a) Order immediate forfeiture of the animal to the agency that took
custody of the animal and authorize appropriate disposition of the animal
including adoption, donation to a suitable shelter, humane destruction, or any
other manner of disposition approved by the court. The court may consider
adoption alternatives through humane societies or comparable institutions and
the protection of such animal's welfare. For a humane society or comparable
institution to be considered as an adoption alternative under this subsection,
it must first be licensed by the Department of Agriculture as having passed the
inspection requirements in the Commercial Dog and Cat Operator Inspection Act
and paid the fee for inspection under the act. The court may prohibit an
adopting or purchasing party from selling such animal for a period not to
exceed one year;
(b) Issue an order to the owner or custodian setting forth the conditions
under which custody of the animal shall be returned to the owner or custodian
from whom the animal was seized or to any other person claiming an interest in
the animal. Such order may include any management actions deemed necessary and
prudent by the court, including reducing the number of animals harbored or
owned by the owner or custodian by humane destruction or forfeiture and
securing necessary care, including veterinary care, sufficient for the
maintenance of any remaining animals; or
(c) Order the owner or custodian from whom the animal was seized to post a
bond or other security or to otherwise order payment in an amount that is
sufficient to reimburse all reasonable expenses, as determined by the court,
for the care of the animal including veterinary care incurred by the agency
from the date of seizure and necessitated by the possession of the animal.
Payments shall be for a succeeding thirty-day period with the first payment due
on or before the tenth day following the hearing. Payments for each subsequent
thirty-day period, if any, shall be due on or before the tenth day of such
period. The bond or security shall be placed with, or payments ordered under
this subdivision shall be paid to, the agency that took custody of the animal.
The agency shall provide an accounting of expenses to the court when the animal
is no longer in the custody of the agency or upon request by the court. The
county attorney of the county where the animal was seized may apply to the
court for a subsequent hearing under this section at any time. The hearing
shall be held as soon as practicable and not more than ten business days after
the date of application for the hearing unless otherwise determined and ordered
by the court. When all expenses covered by the bond or security are exhausted
and subsequent bond or security has not been posted, or if a person becomes
delinquent in his or her payments for the expenses of the animal, the animal
shall be forfeited to the agency.
(4) If custody of an animal is returned to the owner or custodian prior to
seizure, any proceeds of a bond or security or any payment or portion of
payment ordered under this section not used for the care of the animal during
the time the animal was held by the agency shall be returned to the owner or
custodian.
(5) Nothing in this section shall prevent the humane destruction of a
seized animal at any time as determined necessary by a licensed veterinarian or
-2-

LB133 LB133
2025 2025
as authorized by court order.
(6) An appeal may be filed within ten days after a hearing held under this
section. Any person filing an appeal shall post a bond or security sufficient
to pay reasonable costs of care of the animal for thirty days. Such bond or
surety shall be required for each succeeding thirty-day period until the appeal
is final.
(7) If the owner or custodian from whom the animal was seized is found not
guilty in an associated criminal proceeding, all funds paid for the expenses of
the animal remaining after the actual expenses incurred by the agency have been
paid shall be returned to the owner or custodian.
(8) This section shall not preempt any ordinance of a city of the
metropolitan or primary class.
Sec. 4. Section 28-1019, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
28-1019 (1)(a) If a person is convicted of a felony under section 28-1005
or 28-1009, the sentencing court shall order such person not to own, possess,
or reside with any animal for at least five years after the date of conviction,
but such time restriction shall not exceed fifteen years. Any person violating
such court order shall be guilty of a Class I misdemeanor.
(b) If a person is convicted of a Class I misdemeanor under section
28-1005.01 or 28-1009 or a Class III misdemeanor under section 28-1010, the
sentencing court may order such person not to own, possess, or reside with any
animal after the date of conviction, but such time restriction, if any, shall
not exceed five years. Any person violating such court order shall be guilty of
a Class IV misdemeanor.
(c) Any animal involved in a violation of a court order under subdivision
(a) or (b) of this subsection shall be subject to seizure by any law
enforcement officer or animal control officer. Distribution or disposition
shall be made under section 28-1012.01.
(2) This section shall not apply to any person convicted under section
28-1005, 28-1005.01, or 28-1009 if a licensed physician confirms in writing
that ownership or possession of or residence with an animal is essential to the
health of such person.
Sec. 5. Original sections 28-1008, 28-1012, 28-1012.01, and 28-1019,
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
Sec. 6. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when passed and
approved according to law.
-3-